Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3515
Expenses, compensation, and bond of custodial trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the instrument creating the custodial trust, in an agreement with the beneficiary, or by court order, a custodial trustee:

(1) Is entitled to reimbursement from custodial trust property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of fiduciary services;

(2) Has a noncumulative election, to be made no later than three months after the end of each calendar year, to charge a reasonable compensation for fiduciary services performed during that year; and

(3) Need not furnish a bond or other security for the faithful performance of fiduciary duties.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 15.